North Dakota statutes. TITLE 28 Judicial Procedure, Civil
CHAPTER 28-08 Dismissal of Actions [Repealed]

[Superseded by North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure, Rule 41]

28-08-01.
Civil actions dismissed without prejudice, how. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 41.

28-08-02.
Dismissal, how entered. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 41.

28-08-03.
Other judgments must be on merits. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 41.

28-08-04.
Other modes of dismissal abolished. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 41.

28-08-05.
Actions pending five years — When deemed dismissed — Application and order for dismissal. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 41.

28-08-06.
Cases at issue for three jury terms subject to dismissal. [Repealed]

Superseded by N.D.R.Civ.P., Rule 41.